Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-228
Disturbing the peace; punishment.

A city of the first class by ordinance may provide for the punishment of persons disturbing the peace and good order of the city by clamor and noise, by intoxication, drunkenness, fighting, or using obscene or profane language in the streets or other public places, or otherwise violating the public peace by indecent and disorderly conduct, or by lewd or lascivious behavior.

Laws 1901, c. 18, § 48, XXXV, p. 255;

R.S.1913, § 4844;

C.S.1922, § 4012;

C.S.1929, § 16-229;

R.S.1943, § 16-228.

Urinating in public constituted disorderly conduct under ordinance validly enacted pursuant to this section. State v. Cherry, 185 Neb. 103, 173 N.W.2d 887 (1970).